Arkansas, session 2025, HB1928.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 15-20-1106(c), concerning the designated
nutrient application within a nutrient surplus area, is amended to read as
follows:
(c) Designated nutrient application within a nutrient surplus area
shall be applied under time, place, and manner restrictions determined
necessary by the commission, as provided by the commission's inclusion of the
terms in the nutrient management plan or poultry litter management plan, to
protect the soil fertility, crop vitality, and the waters within the state.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 15-20-1107(d), concerning an approved
nutrient management plan constituting a permit to apply nutrients, is amended
to read as follows:
(d)(1) An approved nutrient management plan shall constitute a permit
*CRH306*
03/31/2025 1:54:44 PM CRH306

HB1928
to apply nutrients consistent with the nutrient management plan.
(2) The application of nutrients consistent with an approved
nutrient management plan under subdivision (d)(1) of this section shall not
serve as the basis for any civil or criminal liability, directly or
vicariously, for either the nutrient management plan holder or an agent or a
principal of the nutrient management plan holder.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 15-20-1107, concerning nutrient management
plans, is amended to add additional subsections to read as follows:
(e)(1) An administrative violation of this section shall not serve as
the basis for any criminal or civil action.
(2) An alleged violation of this section is not a basis for a
private right of action or any other action other than enforcement of the
terms of the nutrient management plans with the exception that the commission
may collect administrative fines as authorized under § 15-20-1113.
(f) As used in this section, "approved nutrient management plan" means
a nutrient management plan that has been approved by the relevant authority
and has not been:
(1) Revoked or rescinded by the state or a duly authorized agent
of the state; or
(2) Supplanted by a more recent nutrient management plan.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 15-20-1108(e), concerning an approved
poultry litter management plan constituting a permit to apply nutrients, is
amended to read as follows:
(e)(1) An approved poultry litter management plan shall constitute a
permit to apply nutrients consistent with the poultry litter management plan.
(2) The application of nutrients consistent with an approved
poultry litter management plan under subdivision (e)(1) of this section shall
not serve as the basis for any civil or criminal liability, directly or
vicariously, for either the poultry litter management plan holder or an agent
or a principal of the poultry litter management plan holder.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 15-20-1108, concerning poultry litter
management plans, is amended to add additional subsections to read as
follows:
03/31/2025 1:54:44 PM CRH306

HB1928
(f)(1) An administrative violation of this section shall not serve as
the basis for any criminal or civil action.
(2) An alleged violation of this section is not a basis for a
private right of action or any other action other than enforcement of the
terms of the poultry litter management plans with the exception that the
commission may collect administrative fines as authorized under § 15-20-1113.
(g) As used in this section, "approved poultry litter management plan"
means a poultry litter management plan that has been approved by the relevant
authority and has not been:
(1) Revoked or rescinded by the state or a duly authorized agent
of the state; or
(2) Supplanted by a more recent nutrient management plan.
























03/31/2025 1:54:44 PM CRH306